Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.28.030

United States senate.

When a vacancy occurs in the representation of this state in the senate of the United States, the governor shall make a temporary appointment to that office until the people fill the vacancy by election as provided in this chapter.

[ 2003 c 111 s 703. Prior: 1985 c 45 s 3; 1965 c 9 s 29.68.070; prior: 1921 c 33 s 1; RRS s 3798. Formerly RCW 29.68.070.]

NOTES:

Legislative intent—1985 c 45: See note following RCW 29A.04.420.

Special procedures for primary for United States senate vacancy in 1983: Chapter 1, Laws of 1983 3rd ex. sess. (uncodified).

Vacancies in public office, how caused: RCW 42.12.010.